Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4683.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; NANOPARTICLE IRON NITRIDE PERMANENT MAGNET MANUFACTURING FACILITY.new text end new text begin $50,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the Minnesota forward fund account to the commissioner of employment and economic development to match existing federal funding made available by the Consolidated Appropriations Act of 2026, Public Law 119-75. This appropriation must be used to construct and operate a nanoparticle iron nitride permanent magnet manufacturing facility. This appropriation is not subject to the requirements of Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.8752, subdivision 5. The commissioner may use up to two percent of this appropriation for administration. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2030. Any money that remains unspent is canceled to the general fund. new text end